Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-245
Adjutant General; convey described easement.

The Adjutant General is authorized by the Legislature to convey to the city of Gering, Nebraska, a permanent easement for the construction, reconstruction, inspection, maintenance, operation, and replacement of street improvements in, through, over, and under certain real estate known as the National Guard Armory property and legally described as follows:

Beginning at a point 65.0 feet east of the southwest corner of the southwest quarter of the southeast quarter of section 2, township 21 north, range 55 west of the sixth principal meridian, Scotts Bluff County, Nebraska; thence east, a distance of 300.0 feet parallel with the north line of the southwest quarter of the southeast quarter of said section; thence north, a distance of 25.0 feet parallel to the west line of the southwest quarter of the southeast quarter of said section; thence west, a distance of 300.0 feet parallel to the north line of the southwest quarter of the southeast quarter of said section; thence south, a distance of 25.0 feet to the point of beginning.

Laws 1986, LB 756, § 1.